incubator/apertium-sme-smj.sme.dix
    <pardef n="Niil/á__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>án</l>
          <r>á<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>láin</l>
          <r>á<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ái</l>
          <r>á<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>á<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lá</l>
          <r>á<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lá</l>
          <r>á<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lás</l>
          <r>á<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>láiguin</l>
          <r>á<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>láide</l>
          <r>á<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lát</l>
          <r>á<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>láid</l>
          <r>á<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>láid</l>
          <r>á<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>láin</l>
          <r>á<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Barentsregi/ovdna__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovdnan</l>
          <r>ovdna<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovnnain</l>
          <r>ovdna<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vdnii</l>
          <r>ovdna<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovdna</l>
          <r>ovdna<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovnna</l>
          <r>ovdna<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovnna</l>
          <r>ovdna<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovnnas</l>
          <r>ovdna<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovnnaiguin</l>
          <r>ovdna<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovnnaide</l>
          <r>ovdna<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovnnat</l>
          <r>ovdna<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovnnaid</l>
          <r>ovdna<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovnnaid</l>
          <r>ovdna<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovnnain</l>
          <r>ovdna<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="He/ammu__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ammun</l>
          <r>ammu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amuin</l>
          <r>ammu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mmui</l>
          <r>ammu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ammu</l>
          <r>ammu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amu</l>
          <r>ammu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amu</l>
          <r>ammu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amus</l>
          <r>ammu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amuiguin</l>
          <r>ammu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amuide</l>
          <r>ammu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amut</l>
          <r>ammu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amuid</l>
          <r>ammu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amuid</l>
          <r>ammu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>amuin</l>
          <r>ammu<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Álessav/u__N_Prop">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Ess"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>voniin</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vonii</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vona</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vona</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vonis</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Sg"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>voniiguin</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>voniidda</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vonat</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>voniid</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>voniid</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>voniin</l>
          <r>u<s n="N"/><s n="Prop"/><s n="Pl"/><s n="Loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="Áitesavu"><i>Áitesav</i><par n="Álessav/u__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Álessavu"><i>Álessav</i><par n="Álessav/u__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Bađđásavu"><i>Bađđásav</i><par n="Álessav/u__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Goržánsavu"><i>Goržánsav</i><par n="Álessav/u__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Heammu"><i>He</i><par n="He/ammu__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Láilá"><i>Láil</i><par n="Niil/á__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Niilá"><i>Niil</i><par n="Niil/á__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Barentsregiovdna"><i>Barentsregi</i><par n="Barentsregi/ovdna__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Roavesavu"><i>Roavesav</i><par n="Álessav/u__N_Prop"/></e>
    <e lm="Sieiddesavu"><i>Sieiddesav</i><par n="Álessav/u__N_Prop"/></e>
